nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Handwerk en hobby's > Handwerk- en hobbysets: Sets om kaarsen te maken; Teken- en schildersets; Textielreparatiesets; Kits voor het maken van wierook; Sets om sieraden te maken; Sets voor mozaïeken; Borduurpakketten; Kits voor het maken van parfum; Sets voor plakboeken en stempelen; Kits voor kinderspeelgoed
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 手工艺品 > 手工艺品套装: 蜡烛制作套装; 绘画套装; 纺织品修补工具包; 香薰制作工具套装; 珠宝制作套装; 马赛克风拼图套装; 手工布艺材料套装; 香水制作工具包; 剪贴簿制作/冲压套装; 手工玩具套装
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Výtvarná dielňa > Súpravy pre výtvarnú dielňu: Súpravy na výrobu sviečok; Súpravy na kreslenie a maľovanie; Súpravy na opravu textilných produktov; Súpravy na výrobu vonných sviečok; Súpravy na výrobu šperkov; Mozaikové súpravy; Súpravy na vyšívanie; Súpravy na výrobu parfumov; Súpravy na výrobu leporela a pečiatok; Súpravy na výrobu hračiek
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Arts & Crafts > Art & Craft Kits: Candle Making Kits; Drawing & Painting Kits; Fabric Repair Kits; Incense Making Kits; Jewelry Making Kits; Mosaic Kits; Needlecraft Kits; Perfume Making Kits; Scrapbooking & Stamping Kits; Toy Craft Kits
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Arte e artesanato > Kits de arte e de artesanato: Kits para velas artesanais; Kits para desenho e pintura; Kits para reparos em tecido; Kits para fabricação de incenso; Kits para bijuteria; Kits de mosaicos; Kits de bordado; Kits para fazer perfume; Kits para scrapbooking e carimbagem; Kits para brinquedos artesanais
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Sanatlar ve El İşleri > Sanat ve El İşi Setleri: Mum Yapımı Setleri; Çizim ve Boyama Setleri; Kumaş Tamir Setleri; Tütsü Yapım Setleri; Takı Yapımı Setleri; Mozaik Setleri; Nakış Setleri; Parfüm Yapım Kitleri; Koleksiyon Defterleri ve Kabartma Setleri; Oyuncak El İşi Kitleri
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Đồ thủ công mỹ nghệ > Bộ dụng cụ vẽ và thủ công: Bộ làm nến; Bộ đồ vẽ và sơn; Bộ đồ may vá; Bộ dụng cụ làm hương; Bộ dụng cụ làm đồ trang sức; Đồ chơi ghép hạt nhựa; Bộ dụng cụ thêu thùa; Bộ sản phẩm làm nước hoa; Bộ sách ghép & tem thư; Bộ dụng cụ thủ công đồ chơi
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Изкуства и творчество > Комплекти за изкуство и творчество: Комплекти за правене на свещи; Комплекти за рисуване; Комплекти за поправка на тъкани; Комплекти за приготвяне на тамян; Комплекти за изработка на бижута; Комплекти за мозайка; Комплекти за ръкоделие; Комплекти за приготвяне на парфюми; Комплекти за скрапбукинг и щамповане; Комплекти за изработка на играчки
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Artes e trabalhos manuais > Kits de artes e trabalhos manuais: Kits para fabricar velas; Kits para desenho e pintura; Kits para reparação de tecidos; Kits para fazer incenso; Kits para fazer joalharia; Kits para mosaicos; Kits para trabalhos com agulhas; Kits para fazer perfumes; Kits para álbum de recortes e carimbos; Kits para confeção de brinquedos
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Artizanat > Seturi pentru proiecte de artizanat: Seturi pentru crearea de lumânări; Seturi de desen și pictură; Seturi pentru repararea țesăturilor; Seturi pentru crearea de produse pe bază de tămâie; Seturi pentru crearea de bijuterii; Seturi de mozaic; Seturi pentru cusut; Seturi pentru crearea parfumurilor; Seturi albume și ștampilare; Seturi pentru crearea de jucării
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Искусство и рукоделие > Наборы для художественных работ и рукоделия: Наборы для изготовления свечей; Наборы для рисования; Наборы для ремонта тканей; Наборы для изготовления благовоний; Наборы для изготовления ювелирных украшений; Наборы для создания мозаики; Наборы для вышивания; Наборы для изготовления духов; Наборы для скрапбукинга и тиснения; Наборы для изготовления игрушек
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > ศิลปะและงานฝีมือ > ชุดศิลปะและงานฝีมือ: ชุดทำเทียน; ชุดการวาดและการระบายสี; ชุดซ่อมแซมผ้า; ชุดทำเครื่องหอม; ชุดทำเครื่องประดับ; ชุดงานประดิษฐ์โมเสค; ชุดการประดิษฐ์ด้วยเข็ม; ชุดทำน้ำหอม; ชุดสำหรับสมุดติดรูปและตราประทับ; ชุดงานฝีมือของเล่น
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Művészet és barkácsolás > Művészeti és barkácsolási készletek: Gyertyakészítő készletek; Rajz- és festőkészletek; Szövetjavító készletek; Tömjénkészítő készletek; Ékszerkészítő készletek; Mozaikkészletek; Varrókészletek; Parfümkészítő készletek; Képeslapkészítő- és bélyegzőkészletek; Kézműves játékkészletek
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Menai ir amatai > Menų ir amatų rinkiniai: Žvakių gaminimo rinkiniai; Piešimo ir tapybos rinkiniai; Audinių taisymo rinkiniai; Smilkalų gaminimo rinkiniai; Juvelyrinių dirbinių gaminimo rinkiniai; Mozaikų rinkiniai; Nėrimo, mezgimo ir siuvinėjimo rinkiniai; Kvepalų gamybos rinkiniai; Iškarpų ir štampavimo rinkiniai; Žaislų gaminimo rinkiniai
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Manualidades > Kits de manualidades: Kits para fabricar velas; Kits de dibujo y pintura; Kits de reparación de telas; Kits para la elaboración de incienso; Kits para fabricar joyas; Kits para mosaicos; Kits de bordado; Kits para hacer perfumes; Kits para fabricar sellos y álbumes de recortes; Kits de artesanía con juguetes
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Sztuka i rękodzieło > Zestawy do sztuki i rękodzieła: Zestawy do wyrobu świec; Zestawy do rysowania i malowania; Zestawy do naprawy tkanin; Zestawy do robienia kadzidełek; Zestawy do wyrobu biżuterii; Zestawy do mozaik; Zestawy do haftu gobelinowego; Zestawy do produkcji perfum; Scrapbooking i stemplowanie; Dziecięce zestawy do majsterkowania
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Umjetnost i rukotvorine > Kompleti za umjetnost i rukotvorine: Kompleti za izradu svijeća; Kompleti za crtanje i slikanje; Kompleti za popravak tkanina; Kompleti za izradu mirisnih štapića; Kompleti za izradu nakita; Kompleti za mozaik; Kompleti za izradu rukotvorina iglama; Kompleti za izradu parfema; Kompleti za albume i pečatiranje; Kompleti za izradu igračaka
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Hantverk och hobbyer > Hobbysatser: Ljusstöpningskit; Tecknings- och målningskit; Tygreparationskit; Kit för rökelsetillverkning; Smyckestillverkningskit; Mosaik-kit; Broderi-kit; Parfymtillverkningssatser; Scrapbooking- och stämpelsatser; Leksakspysselkit
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Řemesla a koníčky > Umělecké a hobby sady: Sady na výrobu svíček; Sady na kreslení a malování; Sady na opravu textilií; Sady na výrobu vonných tyčinek; Sady na výrobu bižuterie; Mozaikové sady; Sady na vyšívání; Sady na přípravu parfémů; Sady pro scrapbooking a razítkování; Dětské stavebnice
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Loisirs créatifs > Kits de loisirs créatifs: Kits de fabrication de bougies; Coffrets à dessin et peinture; Kits de réparation pour tissu; Kits de fabrication d’encens; Kits de fabrication de bijoux; Kits de mosaïques; Kits de travaux d’aiguille; Kits de préparation de parfum; Kits de scrapbooking et de décoration au tampon; Coffrets de loisirs créatifs
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > クラフト・アート > アート・クラフトキット: キャンドル製作キット; 画材セット; 布用修繕キット; 手作りお香キット; ジュエリー製作キット; モザイク制作キット; 針編み刺繍キット; 香水製作キット; スクラップブック・スタンプ製作キット; 工作玩具セット
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Håndarbejde og hobby > Sæt til håndarbejde og hobby: Sæt til fremstilling af lys; Tegne- og malesæt; Stof – reparationssæt; Sæt til fremstilling af røgelse; Sæt til fremstilling af smykker; Mosaiksæt; Stramajbroderi – sæt; Sæt til fremstilling af parfume; Sæt til scrapbøger og stempelsæt; Kreativitetssæt
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Artigianato e hobby > Kit per hobby e artigianato: Kit per creare candele; Kit da disegno e pittura; Kit di riparazione per tessuto; Kit per la fabbricazione di incenso; Kit per creare gioielli; Kit per mosaici; Kit per ricamo; Kit per la creazione di profumi; Kit per creare timbri e album di ricordi; Kit per realizzare giochi
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 藝術品和手工藝品 > 美術用具: 蠟燭製作工具組; 彩繪套件; 織品修補工具組; 製香組; 首飾製作工具組; 馬賽克藝術創作組; 縫紉工具組; 香水製作工具包; 卡片剪貼蓋印工具組; 手工玩具組件
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Taide ja askartelu > Taide- ja askartelusetit: Kynttiläntekosarjat; Piirustus- ja maalaussetit; Tekstiilinkorjaussetit; Suitsukkeenvalmistussetit; Korunvalmistussetit; Mosaiikkisetit; Koristeompelusetit; Parfyymien valmistussetit; Skräppäys- ja leimailusetit; Leluaskartelusetit
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Τέχνες & Χειροτεχνίες > Σετ τέχνης & χειροτεχνίας: Σετ κηροπλαστικής; Σετ σχεδίου και ζωγραφικής; Σετ επισκευής υφασμάτων; Σετ παρασκευής λιβανιού; Σετ κατασκευής κοσμημάτων; Σετ μωσαϊκού; Σετ ραπτικής; Κιτ παρασκευής αρωμάτων; Σετ δημιουργίας και διακόσμησης άλμπουμ; Κιτ κατασκευής παιχνιδιών
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Umetnost in ročna dela > Kompleti za umetniško ustvarjanje in ročna dela: Kompleti za svečarstvo; Kompleti za risanje in slikanje; Kompleti za popravilo tkanin; Kompleti za izdelavo kadil; Kompleti za izdelavo nakita; Kompleti za mozaik; Kompleti za pletenje; Kompleti za izdelavo parfumov; Kompleti za ustvarjanje albumov in žigov; Kompleti za izdelavo igrač
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 미술/공예 > 미술/공예 키트: 양초 만들기 키트; 소묘/회화 키트; 옷 수선 키트; 향 제조 키트; 주얼리 제작 키트; 모자이크 키트; 수예품 키트; 향수 제조 키트; 스크랩북/스탬프 키트; 어린이 공작 키트
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Kunsthandwerk & Hobby > Kunst- & Bastelsets: Kerzenherstellungssets; Zeichen- & Malsets; Flicksets; Sets für die Räucherwerkherstellung; Schmuckherstellungssets; Mosaikbausätze; Sticksets; Parfümherstellungssets; Scrapbooking- & Stempelsets; Bastelsets
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Kunst og håndverk > Sett til kunst og håndverk: Sett for lysstøping; Sett for tegning og maling; Sett for stoffreparasjon; Sett for produksjon av røkelse; Sett for smykkelaging; Mosaikksett; Sett for broderi og søm; Sett for parfymeproduksjon; Sett for scrapbooking og stempler; Sett for lekeproduksjon